Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Regulation of Mining Activity.

§ 45.2-1008.
Coal exploration operations.

Any coal exploration operation that substantially disturbs the natural land surface shall be conducted in accordance with exploration regulations adopted by the Director. Such regulations shall, at a minimum, (i) require that any person, prior to conducting any exploration under this section, file with the Director notice of intention to explore that includes a description of the exploration area and the proposed period of exploration and (ii) include provisions for the reclamation, in accordance with the performance standards established pursuant to §

45.2-1017

, of all lands disturbed in exploration, including all excavations, roads, and drill holes, and for the removal of necessary facilities and equipment.

Information submitted to the Director pursuant to this section as confidential concerning trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information that relates to the competitive rights of the person or entity intended to explore the described area shall be exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) and shall not be disclosed.

Any person who conducts any coal exploration activity that substantially disturbs the natural land surface in violation of this section or any regulation issued pursuant thereto is subject to the provisions of §

45.2-1021

.

No person shall remove more than 250 tons of coal while engaged in a coal exploration operation without a specific written coal exploration permit issued by the Director.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-233; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1009.
Permit required for coal surface mining operation; term; transfer, etc.

No person shall engage in or carry out any coal surface mining operation without having first obtained a permit to engage in such operation issued by the Director in accordance with state regulations.

Each coal surface mining permit issued pursuant to the requirements of this chapter shall be for a term of five years. The rights granted under such permit shall not be transferred, assigned, or sold without the written approval of the Director in accordance with regulations adopted by the Director. The Director shall also adopt regulations meeting the requirements of § 506 of the federal act for longer permit terms, successors in interest to the permittee, termination of the permit for failure to commence operation, right of and procedure for permit renewal, and extension of boundaries of a mining operation.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-234; 1980, c. 364; 1983, c. 134; 1984, c. 590; 2013, cc. 47, 129; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1010.
Form and contents of permit application; fee.

Application for a surface mining permit shall be made to the Division in the format required by the Director and shall be signed and verified under oath by the person intending to engage in the surface mining of coal, or the person’s legal representative.

The application shall contain the information required by regulations adopted by the Director, including the information required under the provisions of § 507(b) of the federal act.

To the extent that funds are available from the federal Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement, the Director shall provide for permit application assistance to small operators as provided in § 507(c) and (h) of the federal act. Such assistance shall be provided in accordance with regulations adopted by the Director.

Each applicant for a permit shall be required to submit to the Division as part of the permit application an operation plan and a reclamation plan that meet the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted by the Director.

Each application for a coal surface mining permit issued under this chapter shall be accompanied by a fee of $26 per acre for the area of land to be affected by the total operation for which plans have been submitted. A payment of $13 per acre for any area disturbed under the permit shall be payable annually on the anniversary date of the permit. All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be paid into the Coal Surface Mining Regulatory Fund created pursuant to §

45.2-1007

.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall file a copy of his application for public inspection at an appropriate public office approved by the Director where the mining is proposed to occur. However, information that pertains only to the analysis of the chemical and physical property of the coal, excepting information regarding such mineral or elemental content that is potentially toxic in the environment, shall be kept confidential upon request of the applicant and not made a matter of public record.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall submit to the Division as part of the permit application a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface mining and reclamation operation for which such permit is sought. Such policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount that is not less than that specified in regulations adopted by the Director and is adequate to compensate any person who is injured or whose property is damaged as a result of a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, including by the use of explosives, and who is entitled by law to compensation under applicable provisions of law. Such policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the term of the permit and any renewal, including the length of all reclamation operations. The Director may adopt regulations that provide for the submission by the applicant of evidence of self-insurance, meeting the requirements of this subsection, in lieu of a certificate of a public liability insurance policy.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-235; 1982, c. 246; 1984, c. 590; 1999, c. 114; 2003, cc. 542, 550; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, cc. 542 and 550, cl. 2 provides: “The Virginia Gas and Oil Board shall increase the fee for filing an application for the establishment of units, spacing, or pooling orders, as provided for in 4 VAC 25-160-30, to $130. Action by the Board to increase this fee shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).”

Acts 2003, cc. 542 and 550, cl. 3 provides: “The Department of Mines, Minerals, and Energy shall increase the fee for filing an application to transfer gas or oil permit rights, as provided for in 4 VAC 25-150-120, to $65. Action by the Department to increase this fee shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1011.
Operation and reclamation plans.

Each application for a coal surface mining permit pursuant to state regulations shall include an operation plan and a reclamation plan, in such form and containing such information as the Director requires, including the information required under § 508(a) of the federal act, and meeting the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted by the Director. An operation plan shall not include underground workings. An operation plan and a reclamation plan, as approved by the Director, shall be integral parts of the terms and conditions of a coal surface mining permit.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-236; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1012.
Revision of permits.

The process for revision of a permit is as follows:

During the term of a permit, the permittee may submit an application for a revision of such permit, together with a revised operation plan and reclamation plan, to the Director.

An application for a revision of a permit shall not be approved unless the Director finds that reclamation as required by the federal act and state regulations can be accomplished under the revised reclamation plan. The Director shall establish by regulation the period of time within which the revision shall be approved or disapproved, as well as parameters for a determination of the scale or extent of a revision request for which all permit application information requirements and procedures, including notice and hearings, shall apply; however, any revisions that propose significant alterations in the operation plan or reclamation plan shall, at a minimum, be subject to notice and hearing requirements.

Any extension to the area covered by the permit, except an insignificant boundary revision, shall be made by application for another permit.

The Director shall, within a time limit prescribed in regulations adopted by him, review each outstanding permit and may require reasonable revision or modification of the permit provisions during the term of any permit; however, such revision or modification shall be based upon a written finding and subject to notice and hearing requirements.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-236; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1013.
Approval or denial of permit.

Upon the basis of a complete mining application and reclamation plan or a revision or renewal thereof, as required by the federal act and pursuant to state regulations, including public notification and opportunity for public hearing, the Director shall grant, require modification of, or deny the application for a permit in a reasonable time established by regulation and shall notify the applicant in writing. The applicant shall have the burden of establishing that the application is in compliance with all of the requirements of state regulations. Within 10 days after the granting of a permit, the Director shall notify the government officials in the county or city in which the area of land to be affected is located that a permit has been issued and shall describe the location of the land.

No permit or revision application shall be approved unless the application affirmatively demonstrates, and the Director finds in writing on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available, which shall be documented in the approval and made available to the applicant, that:

The permit application is accurate and complete and that all the requirements of the federal act and state regulations have been complied with;

The applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by the federal act and state regulations can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the permit application;

An assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated mining in the area on the hydrologic balance has been made by the Director in accordance with regulation, and the proposed operation has been designed to prevent material damage to hydrologic balance outside the permit area;

The area proposed to be mined is not included within an area designated as unsuitable for coal surface mining pursuant to this chapter or located within an area under study for such designation in an administrative proceeding commenced pursuant to this chapter; and

In any case in which the private mineral estate has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant has submitted to the Director:

The written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of coal by surface mining methods;

A conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract coal by surface mining methods; or

If the conveyance does not expressly grant the right to extract coal by surface mining methods, evidence that the surface-subsurface legal relationship will be determined in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth. Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the Director to adjudicate any property rights dispute.

The applicant shall file with each permit application a schedule listing all notices of violations of the federal act, this chapter, and any law, rule, or regulation of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any department or agency in the United States pertaining to air or water environmental protection, incurred by the applicant in connection with any coal surface mining operation during the three-year period preceding the date of application. The schedule shall also indicate the final resolution of each such notice of violation. Where the schedule or other information available to the Director indicates that any coal surface mining operation owned or controlled by the applicant is currently in violation of any law, rule, or regulation referred to in this subsection, the permit shall not be issued until the applicant submits proof that such violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the authority, department, or agency that has jurisdiction over such violation. No permit shall be issued to an applicant after a finding by the Director, following an opportunity for a hearing, that the applicant or the operator specified in the application controls or has controlled any mining operation with a demonstrated pattern of willful violations of the federal act or this chapter of such nature and duration and with such resulting irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply with the federal act or this chapter.

If the Director finds an application in compliance with subsection B and the area proposed to be mined contains prime farmland pursuant to § 507(b)(16) of the federal act, the Director shall comply with applicable regulations issued by the Secretary in determining whether to issue a permit for such area.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-238; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1014.
Public participation in process of issuing or revising permits.

The Director shall establish by regulation procedures for the notification of and participation by the public and appropriate federal, state, and local governmental authorities in the process for issuing or revising coal surface mining permits, in accordance with § 513 of the federal act.

Any person having an interest that is or might be adversely affected, or the officer or head of any federal, state, or local governmental agency or authority, has the right to file written objections to the proposed initial or revised application for a permit for a coal surface mining operation with the Director within 30 days after the last publication of the applicant’s notice required by the regulation adopted pursuant to subsection A. If no written objection is filed and an informal hearing is requested, the Director shall then hold an informal hearing in the manner and location prescribed by regulation, unless every party requesting the informal hearing stipulates agreement prior to the requested informal hearing and withdraws such request therefor.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-239; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1015.
Decision of Director upon permit application; hearing; appeal.

The Director shall notify each applicant for a permit within a reasonable time, as set forth in regulations, taking into account the time needed for proper investigation of the site, the complexity of the permit application, and written objections that have been filed, of his written decision to approve or disapprove the application, in whole or in part, except that if an informal hearing has been held pursuant to §

45.2-1014

, the Director shall issue to the applicant and the parties to the hearing his written decision within 60 days of such hearing.

If such application is approved, a permit shall be issued. If such application is disapproved, specific reasons shall be given in the notification. Within 30 days after the applicant is notified of the final decision of the Director on such permit application, the applicant, or any person with an interest that is or might be adversely affected, may request a hearing on the reasons for the final determination. The Director shall hold a formal adjudicatory hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and within 30 days thereafter shall issue to the applicant and every person who participated in the hearing the written decision of the Director granting or denying the permit in whole or in part and stating the reasons therefor. No person who presided at an informal hearing under §

45.2-1014

shall preside at the formal adjudicatory hearing or participate in the decision therein or any administrative appeal therefrom.

Where a hearing is requested pursuant to subsection B, the Director, under such conditions as he prescribes, may grant temporary relief pending final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceeding have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on any request for temporary relief;

The person requesting such relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that he will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Any applicant or person who has an interest that is or might be adversely affected and has participated in the formal hearing as an objector who is aggrieved by the decision of the Director or by the failure of the Director to act within the time limits specified in this chapter has a right to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-240; 1983, c. 92; 1986, c. 615; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1016.
Performance bonds.

After a coal surface mining permit application has been approved, but before such permit is issued, the applicant shall file with the Director, on a form prescribed and furnished by the Director, a bond for performance payable to the Commonwealth and conditioned upon the faithful performance of all the requirements of this chapter and the permit. The bond shall cover that area of land within the permit area upon which the operator plans to initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the initial term of the permit. As each succeeding increment of coal surface mining and reclamation operations is initiated and conducted within the permit area, the permittee shall file with the Director an additional bond to cover such increment in accordance with this section. The amount of the bond required for each bonded area shall be determined by the Director and shall (i) depend upon the reclamation requirements of the approved permit and (ii) reflect the probable difficulty of reclamation, giving consideration to such factors as topography, geology of the site, hydrology, and revegetation potential. The amount of the bond shall be sufficient to assure the completion of the reclamation plan if the work is performed by the Director in the event of forfeiture but in no case shall the bond for the entire area under one permit be less than $10,000.

Liability under a performance bond shall be for the duration of the coal surface mining and reclamation operation and for a period coincident with the operator’s responsibility for revegetation as required under regulations adopted pursuant to §

45.2-1017

. The bond shall be executed by the operator and a corporate surety licensed to do business in the Commonwealth, except that the operator may elect to deposit cash, negotiable bonds of the United States or the Commonwealth, or negotiable certificates of deposit of any bank organized for transacting business in the United States. The cash deposit or market value of such securities shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required for the bonded area.

Cash or securities deposited pursuant to subsection B shall be deposited upon the same terms as the terms upon which surety bonds may be deposited. Such securities shall be security for the repayment of such negotiable certificate of deposit.

The Director may accept a letter of credit on certain designated funds issued by a financial institution authorized to do business in the United States. Such letter of credit shall be irrevocable and unconditional, shall be payable to the Department upon demand, and shall afford the Department protection equivalent to a corporate surety’s bond. Such letter of credit shall be provided on a form and in a format established by the Director. Nothing in this section shall relieve the permittee of responsibility under the permit or the issuer of liability on the letter of credit.

The issuer of a letter of credit pursuant to subsection D shall give prompt notice to the permittee and the Department of any notice received or action filed alleging the insolvency or bankruptcy of the issuer, or alleging any violation of a regulatory requirement that could result in the suspension or revocation of the issuer’s charter or license to do business. In the event the issuer becomes unable to fulfill any of its obligations under the letter of credit for any reason, the issuer shall immediately notify the permittee and the Department. Upon the incapacity of an issuer by a reason of bankruptcy, insolvency, or the suspension or revocation of its charter or license, the permittee shall be deemed to be without proper performance bond coverage and shall promptly notify the Department. The Department shall then issue a notice to the permittee specifying a reasonable period not exceeding 90 days to replace bond coverage. If an adequate bond is not posted by the end of the period allowed, the permittee shall cease coal extraction and coal processing operations and shall immediately begin to conduct reclamation operations in accordance with its reclamation plan. No coal extraction or coal processing operation shall resume until the Department has determined that an acceptable bond has been posted. If an acceptable bond has not been posted by the end of the period allowed, the Department may suspend the permit until an acceptable bond is posted.

The Director may develop and adopt an alternative system to achieve the objectives and purposes of the bonding program established under this section.

The amount of the bond or deposit required and the terms of each acceptance of the applicant’s bond shall be adjusted by the Director from time to time as affected land acreages are increased or decreased or where the cost of future reclamation changes.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-241; 1984, c. 590; 1997, c. 285; 1998, c. 692; 2014, cc. 111, 135; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1017.
Performance standards.

The Director shall by regulation establish performance standards that meet the requirement of § 515 of the federal act, are consistent with regulations adopted thereunder by the Secretary, and are applicable to all coal surface mining and reclamation operations except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Any permit issued pursuant to this chapter to conduct a coal surface mining operation shall require that such operation meets all applicable performance standards established by the Director.

The Director shall include in such regulations special procedures and standards, consistent with regulations adopted by the Secretary, for the issuance of permits for mountaintop removal operations, without regard to requirements to restore to approximate original contour, and for variances from such requirements for steep-slope operations.

The Director may adopt, with the approval of the Secretary, alternative performance standards and procedures for administering and enforcing the program created pursuant to this chapter.

The Director, with the approval of the Secretary, may authorize departures on an experimental basis from the environmental protection performance standards adopted under this section and §

45.2-1018

.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-242; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1018.
Surface effects of underground coal mining operations.

The Director shall adopt regulations directed toward the surface effects of underground coal mining operations and embodying the requirements of §§ 516 and 720(a)(1) of the federal act. The provisions of this chapter relating to permits, bonds, inspections and enforcement, public review, and administrative and judicial review shall be applicable to any surface operation or surface impact incident to an underground coal mine with such modifications to the permit application requirements, permit approval or denial procedures, and bond requirements as are necessary to accommodate the differences between surface and underground coal mining. Nothing in § 720(a)(1) of the federal act shall be construed to prohibit or interrupt any underground coal mining operation.

The regulations adopted by the Director shall require that each permit applicant submit hydrologic reclamation plans that include measures to prevent the sudden release of accumulated water from underground workings.

The Director shall suspend underground coal mining under any elementary or secondary school, institution of higher education, urbanized area, city, town, or community, and adjacent to any industrial or commercial building, major impoundment, or permanent stream, if he finds imminent danger to people from such underground coal mining.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-243; 1984, c. 590; 1993, c. 582; 1996, cc. 409, 410; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1019.
Inspections and monitoring.

For the purpose of administering and enforcing any permit issued under this chapter or determining whether any person is in violation of any requirement of this chapter or any regulation adopted hereunder:

The Director shall require any permittee to (i) establish and maintain appropriate records; (ii) make monthly reports to the Division; (iii) install, use, and maintain any necessary monitoring equipment or methods; (iv) evaluate results in accordance with such methods, at such locations and intervals and in such manner as the Director prescribes; and (v) provide other information relative to a coal surface mining and reclamation operation as the Director deems reasonable and necessary;

For any coal surface mining and reclamation operation that removes or disturbs strata that serve as aquifers and thereby significantly ensure the hydrologic balance of water use, either on or off the mining site, the Director shall specify monitoring sites at which the permittee shall record (i) the quantity and quality of surface drainage above and below the mine site and in the potential zone of influence; (ii) the level, amount, and characteristics of samples of groundwater and aquifers that are potentially affected by mining or are located directly below the deepest coal seam to be mined; and (iii) amount of precipitation. The Director shall specify certain records of well logs and borehole data to be maintained. The monitoring, data collection, and analysis required by this section shall be conducted according to standards and procedures set forth in regulations adopted by the Director in order to assure their reliability and validity; and

Any authorized representative of the Director, without advance notice and upon presentation of appropriate credentials, has (i) the right of entry to, upon, or through any coal surface mining and reclamation operation and (ii) the right to inspect any monitoring equipment, method of exploration, method of operation, or records required by this chapter and to copy any such records.No search warrant shall be required for any entry or inspection under this subsection, except with respect to entry into a building.

Inspections by the Director shall (i) occur on an irregular basis averaging not less than one partial inspection per month and one complete inspection per calendar quarter for the coal surface mining and reclamation operation covered by each permit, (ii) occur without prior notice to the permittee or any agent or employee of the permittee except for necessary on-site meetings with the permittee, and (iii) include the filing of inspection reports adequate to enforce the requirements of this chapter and carry out its terms and purposes.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrance to each coal surface mining and reclamation operation a clearly visible sign setting forth such information as is prescribed by regulation.

Each inspector, upon detection of a violation of any requirement of this chapter or of a regulation adopted hereunder, shall promptly inform the operator in writing and shall report such violation to the Director in writing.

Copies of any records, reports, inspection materials, or information obtained by the Director under this article shall be made immediately available to the public at central and sufficient locations in the area of mining so that they are conveniently available to residents in such areas. However, information that pertains only to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal, excepting information regarding mineral or elemental content that is potentially toxic in the environment, shall be kept confidential and be exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-244; 1984, cc. 323, 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1020.
Enforcement of chapter generally.

If the Director determines that any condition or practice or any violation by a permittee of any requirement of this chapter, regulation adopted hereunder, or permit condition (i) creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or (ii) is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the Director shall immediately order a cessation of the coal surface mining and reclamation operation or the portion thereof relevant to the condition, practice, or violation. Such cessation order shall remain in effect until the Director determines that the condition, practice, or violation has been abated or until such order is modified, vacated, or terminated by the Director. Whenever the Director finds that the ordered cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations, or any portion thereof, is not expected to completely abate the imminent danger to health or safety of the public or the significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the Director shall, in addition to ordering the cessation of the operation, impose affirmative obligations on the operator and require such operator to take whatever steps the Director determines necessary to abate the imminent danger or the significant environmental harm.

If the Director determines that a permittee is in violation of any requirement of this chapter, any regulation adopted hereunder, or any permit condition, but such violation does not create an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or cannot reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the Director shall issue a notice of violation to the permittee or his agent setting a reasonable period of not more than 90 days for the abatement of the violation and shall provide an opportunity for public hearing.

Upon expiration of the period of time originally set pursuant to subsection B or subsequently extended for good cause shown upon the written finding of the Director, if the Director finds that a violation has not been abated, he shall immediately order a cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations or the portion thereof relevant to the violation. Such cessation order shall remain in effect until the Director determines that the violation has been abated or until such order is modified, vacated, or terminated by the Director pursuant to subsection E. The Director shall include in the cessation order the necessary measures to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible.

Whenever the Director determines that a pattern of violations of the requirements of this chapter, any regulation adopted hereunder, or any permit condition exists or has existed, and if the Director also finds that such violations are (i) caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with any such requirements or (ii) willfully caused by the permittee, the Director shall promptly issue an order to the permittee to show cause as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked and shall provide opportunity for a formal public hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Director shall inform all interested parties of the time and place of the hearing. Upon the permittee’s failure to show cause as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked, the Director shall promptly suspend or revoke the permit.

Each notice or order issued pursuant to this section shall set forth with reasonable specificity the nature of the violation and the remedial action required, the period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the coal surface mining and reclamation operation to which the notice or order applies. Each notice or order shall be given promptly to the permittee or his agent by the Director and shall be in writing and signed by the Director. Any notice or order issued pursuant to this section may be modified, vacated, or terminated by the Director. Any notice or order issued pursuant to this section that requires cessation of mining by the operator shall expire within 30 days of actual notice to the operator unless an informal public hearing is held at the site or close enough to the site to allow viewings thereof during the course of the public hearing. Such informal public hearing may be waived by the operator.

The Director may institute a civil action for injunctive or other relief in any court of competent jurisdiction whenever any permittee or his agent, or any other person:

Violates or fails or refuses to comply with any order or decision issued by the Director;

Interferes with, hinders, or delays the Director in carrying out the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder;

Refuses to admit the Director to a mine;

Refuses to permit inspection of a mine;

Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the Director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder;

Refuses to permit access to, and copying of, such records as the Director determines necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder; or

Conducts any coal surface mining or coal exploration operation without first obtaining a permit, after a permit has lapsed, or after suspension or revocation of a permit.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-245; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.